sk-SK: Typ WAN rozhrania: Kábel; Bunkový; DSL; Ethernet; Vláknina; USB; Iné
nl: Wan-interfacetype: Kabel; Mobiel; DSL; Ethernet; Vezel; USB; Andere
lt-LT: WAN sąsajos tipas: Su kabeliu; Korinė; DSL; Eternetas; Skaidulos; USB; Kita
ko: WAN 인터페이스 유형: 케이블; 셀룰러; DSL; 이더넷; 섬유; USB; 기타
fr: Type d’interface WAN: Câble; Cellulaire; DSL; Ethernet; Fibre; USB; Autre
hu: WAN-interfész típusa: Kábel; Mobil; DSL; Ethernet; Rost; USB; Egyéb
vi: Loại giao diện WAN: Cáp; Di động; DSL; Ethernet; Sợi; USB; Khác
cs: Typ rozhraní WAN: Kabel; Mobilní; DSL; Ethernet; Vlákno; USB; Jiné
tr: WAN arayüz tipi: Kablo; Hücresel; DSL; Ethernet; Fiber; USB; Diğer
ja: WANインターフェースの種類: ケーブル; セルラー; DSL; イーサネット; 繊維; USB; その他
ro-RO: Tip interefență WAN: Clasic; Celular; DSL; Ethernet; Fibre; USB; Altele
zh-CN: WAN 接口类型: 线缆; 蜂窝状; DSL; 以太网; 纤维; USB; 其他
pt-BR: Tipo de interface WAN: Cabo; Celular; DSL; Ethernet; Fibra; USB; Outro
hr-HR: Tip WAN sučelja: Kabelski; Mobilna; DSL; Ethernet; Vlakna; USB; Ostalo
en: WAN interface type: Cable; Cellular; DSL; Ethernet; Fiber; USB; Other
es: Tipo de interfaz WAN: Cable; Celular; DSL; Ethernet; Fibra; USB; Otros
el: Τύπος διεπαφής WAN: Σύρμα; Κυψελοειδής; DSL; Ethernet; Φυτικές ίνες; USB; Άλλο
zh-TW: WAN 介面類型: 纜線; 蜂窩網路; DSL; 乙太網路; 纖維; USB; 其他
de: WAN-Schnittstellentyp: Kabel; Mobilfunk; DSL; Ethernet; Faser; USB; Sonstiges
nb: WAN-grensesnitttype: Kabel; Celle; DSL; Ethernet; Fiber; USB; Annet
bg-BG: Тип WAN интерфейс: Кабел; Мобилна; DSL; Ethernet; Фибри; USB; Други
fi: WAN-liitäntätyyppi: Kaapeli; Solu; DSL; Ethernet; Kuitu; USB; Muu
ru: Тип интерфейса WAN: Кабель; Сотовая связь; DSL; Ethernet; Клетчатка; USB; Другой
it: Tipo di interfaccia WAN: Cavo; Cellulare; DSL; Ethernet; Fibra; USB; Altro
pl: Typ interfejsu WAN: Kabel; Komórkowy; DSL; Ethernet; Włókna; USB; Inne
sv: WAN-gränssnittstyp: Kabel; Cellulär; DSL; Ethernet; Fiber; USB; Övrigt
pt-PT: Tipo de interface WAN: Cabo; Celular; DSL; Ethernet; Fibra; USB; Outro
th: ประเภทอินเทอร์เฟซ WAN: เคเบิล; เครือข่ายมือถือ; DSL; อีเทอร์เน็ต; ไฟเบอร์; USB; อื่นๆ
da: WAN-grænsefladetypen: Kabel; Cellulær; DSL; Ethernet; Fiber; USB; Andet
sl-SI: Tip vmesnika WAN: Gosta in dolga; Mobilna; DSL; Ethernet; Vlaknine; USB; Drugo